Tennessee, session 114, HB0524.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 16, Chapter 6, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a defendant may file a motion to
transfer the defendant's criminal case to the veterans treatment court program of a
contiguous county having a population of not less than two hundred twenty thousand
(220,000) nor more than two hundred twenty thousand one hundred (220,100),
according to the 2020 federal census or any subsequent federal census. The court with
jurisdiction over the defendant's case may transfer the case if:
(1) The veterans treatment court program in the contiguous county would
have jurisdiction over the case if the offense had been committed in such county;
(2) The defendant files with the court a written waiver of the right to be
tried by an impartial jury of the county in which the crime was committed; and
(3) The district attorney general for the contiguous county agrees to
accept transfer of the case.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0524
002176
- 1 -